Missouri, session 2026, SB848.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 376.1186, RSMo, is repealed, to read
as follows:
[376.1186. 1. No state-based health
benefit exchange may be established, created, or
operated within this state in order to implement
Section 1311 of the federal health care act, 42
U.S.C. Section 18031, or any other provision of
the federal health care act that relates to the
creation and operation of a state-based health
benefit exchange, unless the authority to create
or operate such an exchange is enacted into law
through:
(1) A bill as prescribed by Article III of
the Missouri Constitution;
(2) An initiative petition as prescribed
by Article III, Section 50 of the Missouri
Constitution; or
(3) A referendum as prescribed by Article
III, Section 52(a) of the Missouri Constitution.
2. In no case shall the authority for
establishing, administering, or operating a
state-based health benefit exchange in Missouri
be based upon an executive order issued by the
governor of Missouri.
3. No department, agency, instrumentality
or political subdivision of the state of
Missouri shall establish any program, promulgate
any rule, policy, guideline or plan or change
any program, rule, policy or guideline to
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 848 2
implement, establish, create, administer or
otherwise operate a state-based health benefit
exchange described in the federal health care
act unless such department, agency,
instrumentality or political subdivision has
received statutory authority to do so in a
manner consistent with subsection 1 of this
section. No department, agency, instrumentality
or political subdivision of the state of
Missouri shall act as an eligible entity as
described in Section 1311(f)(3)(B) of the
federal health care act to perform one or more
of the responsibilities of a state-based health
benefit exchange unless authorized by statute or
a regulation validly promulgated pursuant to
such statute.
4. No department, agency, instrumentality,
or political subdivision of this state shall
apply for, accept or expend federal moneys
related to the creation, implementation or
operation of a state-based health benefit
exchange or a federally facilitated health
benefit exchange unless such acceptance or
expenditure is authorized by statute or an
appropriations bill.
5. No department, agency, instrumentality,
political subdivision, public officer or
employee of this state shall enter into any
agreement or any obligation to establish,
administer, or operate a federally facilitated
health benefit exchange described in Section
1321(c)(1) of the federal health care act unless
such department, agency, instrumentality,
political subdivision, public officer or
employee of this state has received statutory
authority to enter into such agreements or
obligations. No department, agency,
instrumentality, political subdivision, public
officer or employee of this state shall provide
assistance or resources of any kind to any
department, agency, public official, employee or
agent of the federal government related to the
creation or operation of a federally facilitated
health benefit exchange unless such assistance

SB 848 3
or resources are authorized by state statute or
a regulation promulgated thereto or such
assistance or resources are specifically
required by federal law.
6. Any taxpayer of this state or any
member of the general assembly shall have
standing to bring suit against the state of
Missouri or any official, department, division,
agency, or political subdivision of this state
which is in violation of this section in any
court with jurisdiction to enforce the
provisions of this section. The court shall
award attorney's fees, court costs, and all
reasonable expenses incurred by the taxpayer or
member of the general assembly if the court
finds that the provisions of this section have
been violated. Such attorney's fees, court
costs, and reasonable expenses shall be paid
from funds appropriated to the department,
division, agency, or any political subdivision
of this state determined to have violated, in
whole or in part, the provisions of this
section. In no case shall the award of
attorney's fees, court costs, or reasonable
expenses be paid from the legal defense fund,
nor shall any department, division, agency, or
political subdivision of this state request, or
be granted, additional appropriations in order
100 to satisfy an award made under this section.
101 7. As used in this section, the term
102 "federal health care act" shall mean the federal
103 Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act,
104 Public Law 111-148, as amended by the federal
105 Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of
106 2010, Public Law 111-152, and any amendments
107 thereto, or regulations or guidance issued under
108 such federal acts.
109 8. As used in this section, the term
110 "state-based health benefit exchange" means a
111 governmental agency or nonprofit entity
112 established by the state of Missouri and not the
113 federal government that meets the applicable
114 requirements of Section 1311 of the federal
115 health care act and regulations promulgated

SB 848 4
116 thereto and makes qualified health care plans
117 available to qualified individuals and qualified
118 employers. The term "state-based health benefit
119 exchange" includes regional or other interstate
120 exchanges and subsidiary exchanges as described
121 in Section 1311(f)(1) and (2) of the federal
122 health care act. The term "federally
123 facilitated health benefit exchange" means a
124 health benefit exchange established and operated
125 by the Secretary of Health and Human Services
126 under Section 1321(c)(1) of the federal health
127 care act, either directly or through agreement
128 with a not-for-profit entity.]
✓